Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-176
Saline.

The county of Saline is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township five, north, of range one, east; thence east to the southeast corner of township five, north, of range four, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township eight, north, of range four, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township eight, north, of range one, east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 45, p. 221;

R.S.1913, § 891;

C.S.1922, § 793;

C.S.1929, § 25-180;

R.S.1943, § 22-176.